Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4454.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [325D.141] FOOD RETAIL ESTABLISHMENTS; PROHIBITION ON SURVEILLANCE PRICING. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Algorithm" means a computational process that uses a set of rules to define a sequence of operation, including but not limited to artificial intelligence systems and facial-recognition software. new text end new text begin (c) "Consumer" means an individual who purchases goods from a food retail establishment for personal, family, or household use. new text end new text begin (d) "Consumer data" means any data that identifies or could reasonably be directly or indirectly linked to a specific device. Consumer data excludes location data. new text end new text begin (e) "Electronic shelving labels" means individual electronic or wireless paper displays that present product and pricing information. new text end new text begin (f) "Food retail establishment" means a retail store that: new text end new text begin (1) is over 10,000 square feet in size and primarily sells household foodstuff for off-site use, including fresh produce, meats, poultry, fish, deli products, dairy products, canned foods, dry foods, beverages, baked foods, or prepared foods; or new text end new text begin (2) is over 85,000 square feet in size and dedicates at least ten percent of the store's sales floor area to the sale of foodstuff, including fresh produce, meats, poultry, fish, deli products, dairy products, canned foods, dry foods, beverages, baked foods, or prepared foods. new text end new text begin (g) "Personalized algorithmic pricing" means surveillance pricing derived from or set by an algorithm that uses consumer data that may vary among consumers or groups of consumers. new text end new text begin (h) "Protected class data" means information about an individual or group that directly, in combination, or by implication identifies a characteristic that is legally protected from discrimination under state or federal law, including but not limited to ethnicity, national origin, age, disability, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity and expression, pregnancy outcomes, and reproductive health care. new text end new text begin (i) "Surveillance pricing" means offering or setting a customized price for a good for a specific consumer or group of consumers based in whole or in part on consumer data collected through electronic surveillance technology. Surveillance pricing includes the use of technological methods, systems, or tools, including but not limited to sensors, cameras, device tracking, biometric monitoring, or other forms of observation or data collection, that are capable of gathering covered information about a consumer's behavior, characteristics, location, or other personal attributes, whether in physical or digital environments. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Predatory pricing prohibited. new text end new text begin A food retail establishment must not: new text end new text begin (1) use electronic shelving labels; new text end new text begin (2) engage in personalized algorithmic pricing or surveillance pricing; new text end new text begin (3) collect data on individuals under 17 years of age; or new text end new text begin (4) use protected class data to set a price for, offer, market, or sell a good if the: new text end new text begin (i) use of the data has the effect of withholding or denying an accommodation, advantage, or privilege accorded to others; or new text end new text begin (ii) price for the good is different from the price offered to other individuals or groups based in whole or in part on the use of protected class data. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Exclusions. new text end new text begin Nothing in this section: new text end new text begin (1) prohibits a food retail establishment from providing consumers a discount, promotional price, or loyalty program benefit based on previous purchase history; new text end new text begin (2) applies to financial services, including but not limited to state or federally chartered banks, credit unions, and trust companies; mortgage loan originators; broker-dealers; or investment advisors; and new text end new text begin (3) applies to an insurer licensed or authorized to do business in Minnesota. new text end